Texas statutes.
CIVIL PRACTICE AND REMEDIES CODE

TITLE 2. TRIAL, JUDGMENT, AND APPEAL

SUBTITLE C. JUDGMENTS

CHAPTER 32. CONTRIBUTION

Sec. 32.001. APPLICATION. (a) This chapter applies only to tort actions.

(b) This chapter does not apply if a right of contribution, indemnity, or recovery between defendants is provided by other statute or by common law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 32.002. RIGHT OF ACTION. A person against whom a judgment is rendered has, on payment of the judgment, a right of action to recover payment from each codefendant against whom judgment is also rendered.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 32.003. RECOVERY. (a) The person may recover from each codefendant against whom judgment is rendered an amount determined by dividing the number of all liable defendants into the total amount of the judgment.

(b) If a codefendant is insolvent, the person may recover from each solvent codefendant an amount determined by dividing the number of solvent defendants into the total amount of the judgment.

(c) Each defendant in the judgment has a right to recover from the insolvent defendant the amount the defendant has had to pay because of the insolvency.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.